District of Columbia statutes.
42-306

Deed or will necessary for more than one-year term or for limitation upon such.

(a)

For the purposes of this section, “commercial lease” means a lease for nonresidential real property.

(b)

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, no estate of inheritance, or for life, or for a longer term than 1 year, in any real property, corporeal or incorporeal, in the District of Columbia, or any declaration or limitation of uses in the same, for any of the estates mentioned, shall be created or take effect, except by deed signed and sealed by the grantor, lessor, or declarant, in person or by power of attorney or by will.

(c)

Commercial leases for a longer term than 1 year in any real property in the District of Columbia may be signed on behalf of the owner of real property by an authorized agent.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1267, ch. 854, § 492
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 531, ch. 1329
June 11, 1992, D.C. Law 9-116, § 2, 39 DCR 3186
Apr. 27, 1994, D.C. Law 10-110, § 2(a), 41 DCR 1023
Effective date of deeds, see § 42-401.
Statute of frauds, see §§ 28-3501, 28-3503.
This section is referenced in § 42-401.
1981 Ed., § 45-306.
1973 Ed., § 45-106.